Utah statutes.
70A-4-107.   Separate office of a bank.
A branch or separate office of a bank is a separate bank for the purpose of
computing the time within which, and determining the place at or to which,
action may be taken or notices or orders shall be given under this chapter and
under Title 70A, Chapter 3, Uniform Commercial Code -- Negotiable Instruments.
